test/tools/stress.random-lexicons-100.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +N1 +N2 +N3 +N4 +N5 +N6 +N7 +N8 +N9
	+N1%0 +N11 +N12 +N13 +N14 +N15 +N16 +N17 +N18 +N19
	+N2%0 +N21 +N22 +N23 +N24 +N25 +N26 +N27 +N28 +N29
	+N4%0 +N31 +N32 +N33 +N34 +N35 +N36 +N37 +N38 +N39
	+N4%0 +N41 +N42 +N43 +N44 +N45 +N46 +N47 +N48 +N49
	+N5%0 +N51 +N52 +N53 +N54 +N55 +N56 +N57 +N58 +N59
	+V5%0 +V51 +V52 +V53 +V54 +V55 +V56 +V57 +V58 +V59
	+V6%0 +V61 +V62 +V63 +V64 +V65 +V66 +V67 +V68 +V69
	+V7%0 +V71 +V72 +V73 +V74 +V75 +V76 +V77 +V78 +V79
	+ine +ela +ill +ade +abe +abl +all
	+1sg +2sg +3sg +1pl +2pl +3pl
	+ind +cond +pres +past
	+clit

LEXICON N1
+N1:baeu	Cases ;
+N1:bpxä	Cases ;
+N1:bqon	Cases ;
+N1:bpvm	Cases ;
+N1:biew	Cases ;
+N1:brml	Cases ;
+N1:bcmq	Cases ;
+N1:bxjn	Cases ;
+N1:brsk	Cases ;
+N1:baii	Cases ;
+N1:båth	Cases ;
+N1:bilj	Cases ;
+N1:bqhw	Cases ;
+N1:bbkr	Cases ;
+N1:bscq	Cases ;
+N1:bzbn	Cases ;
+N1:bvät	Cases ;
+N1:båqe	Cases ;
+N1:bpds	Cases ;
+N1:bfih	Cases ;
+N1:btyl	Cases ;
+N1:bdwv	Cases ;
+N1:bsgä	Cases ;
+N1:båkb	Cases ;
+N1:bpjc	Cases ;
+N1:bwzu	Cases ;
+N1:brag	Cases ;
+N1:bxfc	Cases ;
+N1:bögw	Cases ;
+N1:btnj	Cases ;
+N1:blyt	Cases ;
+N1:brov	Cases ;
+N1:bqkä	Cases ;
+N1:bvnv	Cases ;
+N1:bwpq	Cases ;
+N1:bvöc	Cases ;
+N1:bhiu	Cases ;
+N1:bbyo	Cases ;
+N1:bnol	Cases ;
+N1:bdir	Cases ;
+N1:bcpa	Cases ;
+N1:biek	Cases ;
+N1:bmpz	Cases ;
+N1:bdfö	Cases ;
+N1:busx	Cases ;
+N1:bnsm	Cases ;
+N1:bmpv	Cases ;
+N1:bxrf	Cases ;
+N1:båfo	Cases ;
+N1:bhxu	Cases ;
+N1:bcty	Cases ;
+N1:bcow	Cases ;
+N1:bmwg	Cases ;
+N1:bänä	Cases ;
+N1:bnsb	Cases ;
+N1:bmjt	Cases ;
+N1:bkvh	Cases ;
+N1:bips	Cases ;
+N1:blks	Cases ;
+N1:bthc	Cases ;
+N1:bsjw	Cases ;
+N1:bilo	Cases ;
+N1:bjdh	Cases ;
+N1:bktä	Cases ;
+N1:byyä	Cases ;
+N1:bjxj	Cases ;
+N1:böml	Cases ;
+N1:bxlq	Cases ;
+N1:brbx	Cases ;
+N1:bdnv	Cases ;
+N1:bphn	Cases ;
+N1:bndo	Cases ;
+N1:bytq	Cases ;
+N1:bdif	Cases ;
+N1:bgåå	Cases ;
+N1:bkwa	Cases ;
+N1:beze	Cases ;
+N1:bcnp	Cases ;
+N1:bfqn	Cases ;
+N1:boti	Cases ;
+N1:bpöi	Cases ;
+N1:bcfh	Cases ;
+N1:bobb	Cases ;
+N1:båzc	Cases ;
+N1:bjhx	Cases ;
+N1:bbvj	Cases ;
+N1:bswq	Cases ;
+N1:bspq	Cases ;
+N1:bvbz	Cases ;
+N1:bcgf	Cases ;
+N1:bkgå	Cases ;
+N1:bnwf	Cases ;
+N1:bxåt	Cases ;
+N1:bldh	Cases ;
+N1:blok	Cases ;
+N1:boyl	Cases ;
+N1:bgåö	Cases ;
+N1:brti	Cases ;
+N1:bpåi	Cases ;


LEXICON N2
+N2:ckåf	Cases ;
+N2:cåxi	Cases ;
+N2:ctaa	Cases ;
+N2:cfcå	Cases ;
+N2:cpkh	Cases ;
+N2:cxgs	Cases ;
+N2:cmöj	Cases ;
+N2:chca	Cases ;
+N2:cznf	Cases ;
+N2:ccäz	Cases ;
+N2:cmwv	Cases ;
+N2:cqca	Cases ;
+N2:cybt	Cases ;
+N2:cqdk	Cases ;
+N2:cpnu	Cases ;
+N2:chso	Cases ;
+N2:ccik	Cases ;
+N2:chkå	Cases ;
+N2:canp	Cases ;
+N2:cvlv	Cases ;
+N2:cbwz	Cases ;
+N2:cyck	Cases ;
+N2:cäop	Cases ;
+N2:cagq	Cases ;
+N2:cämd	Cases ;
+N2:cjwö	Cases ;
+N2:cspn	Cases ;
+N2:crlj	Cases ;
+N2:ctqh	Cases ;
+N2:choc	Cases ;
+N2:cwpe	Cases ;
+N2:cmhr	Cases ;
+N2:cuoj	Cases ;
+N2:cfeo	Cases ;
+N2:cdyn	Cases ;
+N2:cöwj	Cases ;
+N2:cuaö	Cases ;
+N2:cjkm	Cases ;
+N2:czxö	Cases ;
+N2:cxcp	Cases ;
+N2:cmym	Cases ;
+N2:cxex	Cases ;
+N2:clcj	Cases ;
+N2:cföl	Cases ;
+N2:cnäj	Cases ;
+N2:cdqx	Cases ;
+N2:clgö	Cases ;
+N2:ccäw	Cases ;
+N2:cswh	Cases ;
+N2:cybk	Cases ;
+N2:cfto	Cases ;
+N2:cvrx	Cases ;
+N2:cdwä	Cases ;
+N2:cyin	Cases ;
+N2:ctax	Cases ;
+N2:cxml	Cases ;
+N2:cnzä	Cases ;
+N2:cuyb	Cases ;
+N2:cjfl	Cases ;
+N2:cquc	Cases ;
+N2:cggä	Cases ;
+N2:csrv	Cases ;
+N2:ccul	Cases ;
+N2:chyä	Cases ;
+N2:crpd	Cases ;
+N2:cymg	Cases ;
+N2:cvje	Cases ;
+N2:cjri	Cases ;
+N2:cåvk	Cases ;
+N2:cejf	Cases ;
+N2:cåwå	Cases ;
+N2:cwfr	Cases ;
+N2:cjau	Cases ;
+N2:cmcg	Cases ;
+N2:cöjg	Cases ;
+N2:cvoo	Cases ;
+N2:cfem	Cases ;
+N2:cxvg	Cases ;
+N2:crgm	Cases ;
+N2:cwvf	Cases ;
+N2:chpa	Cases ;
+N2:cömå	Cases ;
+N2:cöbh	Cases ;
+N2:ccxo	Cases ;
+N2:cxjä	Cases ;
+N2:crix	Cases ;
+N2:caxs	Cases ;
+N2:cmdl	Cases ;
+N2:cvxu	Cases ;
+N2:ccur	Cases ;
+N2:coft	Cases ;
+N2:ctif	Cases ;
+N2:cxgc	Cases ;
+N2:cknö	Cases ;
+N2:cgön	Cases ;
+N2:ctdö	Cases ;
+N2:coln	Cases ;
+N2:cxot	Cases ;
+N2:csnx	Cases ;


LEXICON N3
+N3:dmyx	Cases ;
+N3:dvöp	Cases ;
+N3:dmgl	Cases ;
+N3:dgmb	Cases ;
+N3:dixd	Cases ;
+N3:dazz	Cases ;
+N3:dråk	Cases ;
+N3:dfår	Cases ;
+N3:dögv	Cases ;
+N3:dkht	Cases ;
+N3:didd	Cases ;
+N3:dilj	Cases ;
+N3:döög	Cases ;
+N3:dcdy	Cases ;
+N3:dlar	Cases ;
+N3:djnd	Cases ;
+N3:dkti	Cases ;
+N3:dzar	Cases ;
+N3:dwhj	Cases ;
+N3:dngl	Cases ;
+N3:däpx	Cases ;
+N3:dzwe	Cases ;
+N3:dzgb	Cases ;
+N3:dswu	Cases ;
+N3:dtvz	Cases ;
+N3:döxv	Cases ;
+N3:dbcs	Cases ;
+N3:djtu	Cases ;
+N3:ddot	Cases ;
+N3:dqpa	Cases ;
+N3:dsep	Cases ;
+N3:dlän	Cases ;
+N3:dwbt	Cases ;
+N3:dgcc	Cases ;
+N3:dxco	Cases ;
+N3:dlåä	Cases ;
+N3:dyts	Cases ;
+N3:dmål	Cases ;
+N3:dfsl	Cases ;
+N3:dyjv	Cases ;
+N3:djlz	Cases ;
+N3:dånö	Cases ;
+N3:dggf	Cases ;
+N3:daxc	Cases ;
+N3:dptg	Cases ;
+N3:dtcl	Cases ;
+N3:dczj	Cases ;
+N3:dsqh	Cases ;
+N3:döej	Cases ;
+N3:dvpi	Cases ;
+N3:dhph	Cases ;
+N3:dhht	Cases ;
+N3:dree	Cases ;
+N3:doät	Cases ;
+N3:dsvj	Cases ;
+N3:dläm	Cases ;
+N3:dsrk	Cases ;
+N3:duwd	Cases ;
+N3:dvxö	Cases ;
+N3:davo	Cases ;
+N3:dsmv	Cases ;
+N3:dnxl	Cases ;
+N3:dwta	Cases ;
+N3:dkqr	Cases ;
+N3:dlfn	Cases ;
+N3:dqor	Cases ;
+N3:dbnt	Cases ;
+N3:dpsf	Cases ;
+N3:domn	Cases ;
+N3:dzfh	Cases ;
+N3:dycz	Cases ;
+N3:dhol	Cases ;
+N3:drxm	Cases ;
+N3:dåhä	Cases ;
+N3:dhfq	Cases ;
+N3:dåey	Cases ;
+N3:ddmy	Cases ;
+N3:dzqt	Cases ;
+N3:dvme	Cases ;
+N3:deäh	Cases ;
+N3:döcx	Cases ;
+N3:dåbh	Cases ;
+N3:ddxp	Cases ;
+N3:dåvv	Cases ;
+N3:dnii	Cases ;
+N3:dövw	Cases ;
+N3:dqzk	Cases ;
+N3:dfhg	Cases ;
+N3:duwv	Cases ;
+N3:dhik	Cases ;
+N3:dåfd	Cases ;
+N3:dmay	Cases ;
+N3:dapv	Cases ;
+N3:ddwf	Cases ;
+N3:dhhx	Cases ;
+N3:dwcy	Cases ;
+N3:dbol	Cases ;
+N3:dgzd	Cases ;
+N3:dyåw	Cases ;


LEXICON N4
+N4:eboe	Cases ;
+N4:ezbx	Cases ;
+N4:ekrå	Cases ;
+N4:ezjg	Cases ;
+N4:egöq	Cases ;
+N4:ekve	Cases ;
+N4:enky	Cases ;
+N4:eämd	Cases ;
+N4:emkn	Cases ;
+N4:evkv	Cases ;
+N4:edop	Cases ;
+N4:etlh	Cases ;
+N4:etjs	Cases ;
+N4:excv	Cases ;
+N4:eåmz	Cases ;
+N4:eslå	Cases ;
+N4:eisp	Cases ;
+N4:enåö	Cases ;
+N4:epnu	Cases ;
+N4:epgb	Cases ;
+N4:eqtc	Cases ;
+N4:evaq	Cases ;
+N4:efec	Cases ;
+N4:eylr	Cases ;
+N4:evfk	Cases ;
+N4:emaw	Cases ;
+N4:emaf	Cases ;
+N4:eptg	Cases ;
+N4:ebuk	Cases ;
+N4:empk	Cases ;
+N4:epyg	Cases ;
+N4:efjs	Cases ;
+N4:emvp	Cases ;
+N4:eckd	Cases ;
+N4:eema	Cases ;
+N4:edpn	Cases ;
+N4:eaäz	Cases ;
+N4:enxu	Cases ;
+N4:eågv	Cases ;
+N4:eäcd	Cases ;
+N4:eish	Cases ;
+N4:ewån	Cases ;
+N4:ewoo	Cases ;
+N4:efkk	Cases ;
+N4:etoj	Cases ;
+N4:egpc	Cases ;
+N4:enjb	Cases ;
+N4:eyäl	Cases ;
+N4:eöxg	Cases ;
+N4:ehrq	Cases ;
+N4:ehvb	Cases ;
+N4:epak	Cases ;
+N4:ejåz	Cases ;
+N4:ewöe	Cases ;
+N4:ejrh	Cases ;
+N4:ebhö	Cases ;
+N4:epdo	Cases ;
+N4:emcu	Cases ;
+N4:edbå	Cases ;
+N4:eiqv	Cases ;
+N4:eyap	Cases ;
+N4:eiui	Cases ;
+N4:eaål	Cases ;
+N4:euvb	Cases ;
+N4:eåql	Cases ;
+N4:egoo	Cases ;
+N4:euji	Cases ;
+N4:exgä	Cases ;
+N4:edre	Cases ;
+N4:eåyi	Cases ;
+N4:enwa	Cases ;
+N4:etvi	Cases ;
+N4:emcn	Cases ;
+N4:exhn	Cases ;
+N4:eiuö	Cases ;
+N4:ebpv	Cases ;
+N4:ezal	Cases ;
+N4:euqn	Cases ;
+N4:epnh	Cases ;
+N4:enii	Cases ;
+N4:emsc	Cases ;
+N4:eriö	Cases ;
+N4:eghx	Cases ;
+N4:edår	Cases ;
+N4:edng	Cases ;
+N4:eaxb	Cases ;
+N4:ewra	Cases ;
+N4:ewpa	Cases ;
+N4:eögi	Cases ;
+N4:erve	Cases ;
+N4:exzo	Cases ;
+N4:eqff	Cases ;
+N4:edre	Cases ;
+N4:eoöv	Cases ;
+N4:enjm	Cases ;
+N4:ekäw	Cases ;
+N4:eönö	Cases ;
+N4:elqe	Cases ;
+N4:enaz	Cases ;

LEXICON Root
a	N1	;
b	N2	;
c	N3	;
d N4 ;
